Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201285-2421
Violations of act; commission; petition
for injunction; additional remedies.

If it appears to the commission that any
entity is or has been violating the Postsecondary Institution Act or any of
the rules, regulations, or orders of the commission, the commission may file
a petition for injunction in the name of the commission in any court of competent
jurisdiction in this state against such entity for the purpose of enjoining
such violation or for an order directing compliance with the act and any rules,
regulations, and orders. The commission shall not be required to allege or
prove that there is no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction provided
in this section shall be in addition to any other legal remedy which the commission
may possess and shall be in addition to any right of criminal prosecution
provided by law. The commission shall not obtain a temporary restraining order
without notice to the entity affected. The pendency of commission action with
respect to alleged violations shall not operate as a bar to an action for
injunctive relief pursuant to this section.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 21.